Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.380

Ministerial functions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried out as part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise of personal judgment or discretion.

[ 2024 c 164 s 238.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.